Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2,157
Hybrid seed corn; violations; penalty; enforcement action; Director of Agriculture; duties.

(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of sections 81-2,155 and 81-2,156 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) In addition to the criminal penalty provided under subsection (1) of this section, a restraining order or a temporary, permanent, or mandatory injunction may be imposed against any person to restrain the commission or continuance of any act in violation of any of the provisions of sections 81-2,155 and 81-2,156. The district court of the county where such act is occurring or about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

(3) Whenever the Director of Agriculture has a reasonable belief that the commission or continuance of any act is in violation of sections 81-2,155 and 81-2,156, the director shall report such belief to the Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which such act is occurring or about to occur. Upon satisfactory information provided by the director, the Attorney General or the appropriate county attorney may cause appropriate proceedings pursuant to this section to be initiated without delay.

Laws 1937, c. 4, § 3, p. 56;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-1825;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,157;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 282;

Laws 2017, LB276, § 3.